Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.280

Filing of articles of dissolution.

The articles of dissolution shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

Upon the filing of the articles of dissolution, the corporate existence shall cease, except for the purpose of determining such suits, other proceedings and appropriate corporate action by members, directors and officers as are authorized in this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4115; 1982 c 35 s 139; 1981 c 302 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 56.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.